California statutes. Water Code
(b) The standards shall incorporate the principles of the model water efficient landscape ordinance adopted by the department pursuant to the Water Conservation in Landscaping Act (Article 10.8 (commencing with Section 65591) of Chapter 3 of Division 1 of Title 7 of the Government Code).

(c) The standards shall include an exclusion for water for commercial agricultural use meeting the definition of subdivision (b) of Section 51201 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 15, Sec. 7.   (AB 1668)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

10609.9.

For purposes of Sections 10609.6 and 10609.8, “principles of the model water efficient landscape ordinance” means those provisions of the model water efficient landscape ordinance applicable to the establishment or determination of the amount of water necessary to efficiently irrigate both new and existing landscapes. These provisions include, but are not limited to, all of the following:

(a) Evapotranspiration adjustment factors, as applicable.

(b) Landscape area.

(c) Maximum applied water allowance.

(d) Reference evapotranspiration.

(e) Special landscape areas, including provisions governing evapotranspiration adjustment factors for different types of water used for irrigating the landscape.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 15, Sec. 7.   (AB 1668)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

10609.10.

(a) The department, in coordination with the board, shall conduct necessary studies and investigations and recommend, no later than October 1, 2021, performance measures for CII water use for adoption by the board in accordance with this chapter.

(b) Prior to recommending performance measures for CII water use, the department shall solicit broad public participation from stakeholders and other interested persons relating to all of the following:

(1) Recommendations for a CII water use classification system for California that address significant uses of water.

(2) Recommendations for setting minimum size thresholds for converting mixed CII meters to dedicated irrigation meters, and evaluation of, and recommendations for, technologies that could be used in lieu of requiring dedicated irrigation meters.

(3) Recommendations for CII water use best management practices, which may include, but are not limited to, water audits and water management plans for those CII customers that exceed a recommended size, volume of water use, or other threshold.

(c) Recommendations of appropriate performance measures for CII water use shall be consistent with the
 October 21, 2013, report to the Legislature by the Commercial, Industrial, and Institutional Task Force entitled “Water Use Best Management Practices,”
 including the technical and financial feasibility recommendations provided in that report, and shall support the economic productivity of California’s commercial, industrial, and institutional sectors.

(d) (1) The board, in coordination with the department, shall
 adopt performance measures for CII water use on or before June 30, 2022.

(2) Each urban retail water supplier shall implement the performance measures adopted by the board pursuant to paragraph (1).

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 15, Sec. 7.   (AB 1668)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

10609.12.

The standards for water loss for urban retail water suppliers shall be the standards adopted by the board pursuant to subdivision (i) of Section 10608.34.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 15, Sec. 7.   (AB 1668)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

10609.14.

(a) The department, in coordination with the board, shall conduct necessary studies and investigations and, no later than October 1, 2021, recommend for adoption by the board in accordance with this chapter appropriate variances for unique uses that can have a material effect on an urban retail water supplier’s urban water use objective.

(b) Appropriate variances may include, but are not limited to, allowances for the following:

(1) Significant use of evaporative coolers.

(2) Significant populations of horses and other livestock.

(3) Significant fluctuations in seasonal populations.

(4) Significant landscaped areas irrigated with recycled water having high levels of total dissolved solids.

(5) Significant use of water for soil compaction and dust control.

(6) Significant use of water to supplement ponds and lakes to sustain wildlife.

(7) Significant use of water to irrigate vegetation for fire protection.

(8) Significant use of water for commercial or noncommercial agricultural use.

(c) The department,
 in recommending variances for adoption by the board, shall also recommend a threshold of significance for each recommended variance.

(d) Before including any specific variance in calculating an urban retail water supplier’s water use objective, the urban retail water supplier shall request and receive approval by the board for the inclusion of that variance.

(e) The board shall post on its Internet Web site all of the following:

(1) A list of all urban retail water suppliers with approved variances.

(2) The specific variance or variances approved for each urban retail water supplier.

(3) The data supporting approval of each variance.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 15, Sec. 7.   (AB 1668)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

10609.15.

To help streamline water data reporting, the department and the board shall do all of the following:

(a) Identify urban water reporting requirements shared by both agencies, and post on each agency’s Internet Web site how the data is used for planning, regulatory, or other purposes.

(b) Analyze opportunities for more efficient publication of urban water reporting requirements within each agency, and analyze how each agency can integrate various data sets in a publicly accessible location, identify priority actions, and implement priority actions identified in the analysis.

(c) Make appropriate data pertaining to the urban water
 reporting requirements that are collected by either agency available to the public according to the principles and requirements of the Open and Transparent Water Data Act (Part 4.9 (commencing with Section 12400)).

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 15, Sec. 7.   (AB 1668)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

10609.16.

The department, in coordination with the board, shall conduct necessary studies and investigations and recommend, no later than October 1, 2021, guidelines and methodologies for the board to adopt that identify how an urban retail water supplier calculates its urban water use objective. The guidelines and methodologies shall address, as necessary, all of the following:

(a) Determining the irrigable lands within the urban retail water supplier’s service area.

(b) Updating and revising methodologies described pursuant to subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (h) of Section 10608.20, as appropriate, including
 methodologies for calculating the population in an urban retail water supplier’s service area.

(c) Using landscape area data provided by the department or alternative data.

(d) Incorporating precipitation data and climate data into estimates of a urban retail water supplier’s outdoor irrigation budget for its urban water use objective.

(e) Estimating changes in outdoor landscape area and population, and calculating the urban water use objective, for years when updated landscape imagery is not available from the department.

(f) Determining acceptable levels of accuracy for the supporting data, the urban water use objective, and compliance with the urban water
 use objective.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 15, Sec. 7.   (AB 1668)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

10609.18.

The department and the board shall solicit broad public participation from stakeholders and other interested persons in the development of the standards and the adoption of regulations pursuant to this chapter. The board shall hold at least one public meeting before taking any action on any standard or variance recommended by the department.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 15, Sec. 7.   (AB 1668)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

10609.20.

(a) Each urban retail water supplier shall calculate its urban water use objective no later than January 1, 2024, and by January 1 every year thereafter.

(b) The calculation shall be based on the urban retail water supplier’s water use conditions for the previous calendar or fiscal year.

(c) Each urban water supplier’s urban water use objective shall be composed of the sum of the following:

(1) Aggregate estimated efficient indoor residential water use.

(2) Aggregate estimated efficient outdoor residential water use.

(3) Aggregate estimated efficient outdoor irrigation of landscape areas with dedicated irrigation meters or equivalent technology in connection with CII water use.

(4) Aggregate estimated efficient water losses.

(5) Aggregate estimated water use in accordance with variances, as appropriate.

(d) (1) An urban retail water supplier that delivers water from a groundwater basin, reservoir, or other source that is augmented by potable reuse water may adjust its urban water use objective by a bonus incentive calculated pursuant to this subdivision.

(2) The water use objective bonus incentive shall be the volume of its potable reuse delivered to residential water users and to landscape areas with dedicated irrigation meters in
 connection with CII water use, on an acre-foot basis.

(3) The bonus incentive pursuant to paragraph (1) shall be limited in accordance with one of the following:

(A) The bonus incentive shall not exceed 15 percent of the urban water supplier’s water use objective for any potable reuse water produced at an existing facility.

(B) The bonus incentive shall not exceed 10 percent of the urban water supplier’s water use objective for any potable reuse water produced at any facility that is not an existing facility.

(4) For purposes of this subdivision, “existing facility” means a facility that meets all of the following:

(A) The facility has a certified environmental impact report, mitigated
 negative declaration, or negative declaration on or before January 1, 2019.

(B) The facility begins producing and delivering potable reuse water on or before January 1, 2022.

(C) The facility uses microfiltration and reverse osmosis technologies to produce the potable reuse water.

(e) (1) The calculation of the urban water use objective shall be made using landscape area and other data provided by the department and pursuant to the standards, guidelines, and methodologies adopted by the board. The department shall provide data to the urban water supplier at a level of detail sufficient to allow the urban water supplier to verify its accuracy at the parcel level.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), an urban retail water supplier may
 use alternative data in calculating the urban water use objective if the supplier demonstrates to the department that the alternative data are equivalent, or superior, in quality and accuracy to the data provided by the department. The department may provide technical assistance to an urban retail water supplier in evaluating whether the alternative data are appropriate for use in calculating the supplier’s urban water use objective.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 239, Sec. 2.   (AB 1414)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

10609.21.

(a) For purposes of Section 10609.20, and notwithstanding paragraph (4) of subdivision (d) of Section 10609.20, “existing facility” also includes the North City Project, phase one of the Pure Water San Diego Program, for which an environmental impact report was certified on April 10, 2018.

(b) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2019.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 453, Sec. 4.   (SB 875)   Effective September 17, 2018.   Section operative January 1, 2019, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

10609.22.

(a) An urban retail water supplier shall calculate its actual urban water use no later than January 1, 2024, and by January 1 every year thereafter.

(b) The calculation shall be based on the urban retail water supplier’s water use for the previous calendar or fiscal year.

(c) Each urban water supplier’s urban water use shall be composed of the sum of the following:

(1) Aggregate residential water use.

(2) Aggregate outdoor irrigation of landscape areas with dedicated irrigation meters in connection with CII water use.

(3) Aggregate water losses.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 239, Sec. 3.   (AB 1414)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

10609.24.

(a) An urban retail water supplier shall submit a report to the department no later than January 1, 2024, and by January 1 every year thereafter. The report shall include all of the following:

(1) The urban water use objective calculated pursuant to Section 10609.20 along with relevant supporting data.

(2) The actual urban water use calculated pursuant to Section 10609.22 along with relevant supporting data.

(3) Documentation of the implementation of the performance measures for CII water use.

(4) A description of the progress made towards meeting the urban water use
 objective.

(5) The validated water loss audit report conducted pursuant to Section 10608.34.

(b) The department shall post the reports and information on its internet website.

(c) The board may issue an information order or conservation order to, or impose civil liability on, an entity or individual for failure to submit a report required by this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 239, Sec. 4.   (AB 1414)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

10609.25.

As part of the first report submitted to the department by an urban retail water supplier no later than January 1, 2024, pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 10609.24, each urban retail water supplier shall provide a narrative that describes the water demand management measures that the supplier plans to implement to achieve its urban water use objective by January 1, 2027.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 239, Sec. 5.   (AB 1414)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

10609.26.

(a) (1) On and after January 1, 2024, the board may issue informational orders pertaining to water production, water use, and water conservation to an urban retail water supplier that does not meet its urban water use objective required by this chapter. Informational orders are intended to obtain information on supplier activities, water production, and conservation efforts in order to identify technical assistance needs and assist urban water suppliers in meeting their urban water use objectives.

(2) In determining whether to issue an informational order, the board shall consider the degree to which the urban retail water supplier is not meeting its urban water use objective, information provided in the report required by Section 10609.24,
 and actions the urban retail water supplier has implemented or will implement in order to help meet the urban water use objective.

(3) The board shall share information received pursuant to this subdivision with the department.

(4) An urban water supplier may request technical assistance from the department. The technical assistance may, to the extent available, include guidance documents, tools, and data.

(b) On and after January 1, 2025, the board may issue a written notice to an urban retail water supplier that does not meet its urban water use objective required by this chapter. The written notice may warn the urban retail water supplier that it is not meeting its urban water use objective described in Section 10609.20 and is not making adequate progress in meeting the urban water use objective, and may request
 that the urban retail water supplier address areas of concern in its next annual report required by Section 10609.24. In deciding whether to issue a written notice, the board may consider whether the urban retail water supplier has received an informational order, the degree to which the urban retail water supplier is not meeting its urban water use objective, information provided in the report required by Section 10609.24, and actions the urban retail water supplier has implemented or will implement in order to help meet its urban water use objective.

(c) (1) On and after January 1, 2026, the board may issue a conservation order to an urban retail water supplier that does not meet its urban water use objective. A conservation order may consist of, but is not limited to, referral to the department for technical assistance, requirements for education and outreach, requirements for local enforcement, and other efforts to
 assist urban retail water suppliers in meeting their urban water use objective.

(2) In issuing a conservation order, the board shall identify specific deficiencies in an urban retail water supplier’s progress towards meeting its urban water use objective, and identify specific actions to address the deficiencies.

(3) The board may request that the department provide an urban retail water supplier with technical assistance to support the urban retail water supplier’s actions to remedy the deficiencies.

(d) A conservation order issued in accordance with this chapter may include requiring actions intended to increase water-use efficiency, but shall not curtail or otherwise limit the exercise of a water right, nor shall it require the imposition of civil liability pursuant to Section
 377.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 239, Sec. 6.   (AB 1414)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

10609.27.

Notwithstanding Section 10609.26, the board shall not issue an information order, written notice, or conservation order pursuant to Section 10609.26 if both of the following conditions are met:

(a) The board determines that the urban retail water supplier is not meeting its urban water use objective solely because the volume of water loss exceeds the urban retail water supplier’s standard for water loss.

(b) Pursuant to Section 10608.34, the board is taking enforcement action against the urban retail water supplier for not meeting the performance standards for the volume of water losses.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 203, Sec. 1.   (SB 134)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

10609.28.

The board may issue a regulation or informational order requiring a wholesale water supplier, an urban retail water supplier, or a distributor of a public water supply, as that term is used in Section 350, to provide a monthly report relating to water production, water use, or water conservation.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 14, Sec. 12.   (SB 606)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

10609.30.

On or before January 10, 2024, the Legislative Analyst shall provide to the appropriate policy committees of both houses of the Legislature and the public a report evaluating the implementation of the water use efficiency standards and water use reporting pursuant to this chapter. The board and the department shall provide the Legislative Analyst with the available data to complete this report.

(a) The report shall describe all of the following:

(1) The rate at which urban retail water users are complying with the standards, and factors that might facilitate or impede their compliance.

(2) The accuracy of the data and estimates being used to calculate urban water use objectives.

(3) Indications of the economic impacts, if any, of the implementation of this chapter on urban water suppliers and urban water users, including CII water users.

(4) The frequency of use of the bonus incentive, the volume of water associated with the bonus incentive, value to urban water suppliers of the bonus incentive, and any implications of the use of the bonus incentive on water use efficiency.

(5) The early indications of how implementing this chapter might impact the efficiency of statewide urban water use.

(6) Recommendations, if any, for improving statewide urban water use efficiency and the standards and practices described in this chapter.

(7) Any other issues the Legislative Analyst deems appropriate.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 14, Sec. 13.   (SB 606)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

10609.32.

It is the intent of the Legislature that the chairperson of the board and the director of the department appear before the appropriate policy committees of both houses of the Legislature on or around January 1, 2026, and report on the implementation of the water use efficiency standards and water use reporting pursuant to this chapter. It is the intent of the Legislature that the topics to be covered include all of the following:

(a) The rate at which urban retail water suppliers are complying with the standards, and factors that might facilitate or impede their compliance.

(b) What enforcement actions have been taken, if any.

(c) The accuracy of the data and estimates being used to calculate urban water use objectives.

(d) Indications of the economic impacts, if any, of the implementation of this chapter on urban water suppliers and urban water users, including CII water users.

(e) The frequency of use of the bonus incentive, the volume of water associated with the bonus incentive, value to urban water suppliers of the bonus incentive, and any implications of the use of the bonus incentive on water use efficiency.

(f) An assessment of how implementing this chapter is affecting the efficiency of statewide urban water use.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 14, Sec. 14.   (SB 606)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

10609.33.

(a) On or before January 1, 2028, the department, in coordination with the board, shall submit a report to the Legislature on the progress of urban retail water suppliers towards achieving their urban water use objective pursuant to Section 10609.2.

(b) (1) The requirement for submitting a report imposed under subdivision (a) is inoperative on January 1, 2032, pursuant to Section 10231.5 of the Government Code.

(2) A report to be submitted pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 679, Sec. 2.   (SB 1157)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

10609.34.

Notwithstanding Section 15300.2 of Title 14 of the California Code of Regulations, an action of the board taken under this chapter shall be deemed to be a Class 8 action, within the meaning of Section 15308 of Title 14 of the California Code of Regulations, provided that the action does not involve relaxation of existing water conservation or water use standards.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 14, Sec. 15.   (SB 606)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

10609.36.

(a) Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to determine or alter water rights. Sections 1010 and 1011 apply to water conserved through implementation of this chapter.

(b) Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to authorize the board to update or revise water use efficiency standards authorized by this chapter except as explicitly provided in this chapter. Authorization to update the standards beyond that explicitly provided in this chapter shall require separate legislation. 

(c) Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to limit or otherwise
 affect the use of recycled water as seawater barriers for groundwater salinity management.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 14, Sec. 16.   (SB 606)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

10609.38.

The board may waive the requirements of this chapter for a period of up to five years for any urban retail water supplier whose water deliveries are significantly affected by changes in water use as a result of damage from a disaster such as an earthquake or fire. In establishing the period of a waiver, the board shall take into consideration the breadth of the damage and the time necessary for the damaged areas to recover from the disaster.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 14, Sec. 17.   (SB 606)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 10. Countywide Drought and Water Shortage Contingency Plans [10609.40. - 10609.42.]

10609.40.

The Legislature finds and declares both of the following:

(a) Small water suppliers and rural communities are often not covered by established water shortage planning requirements. Currently, most counties do not address water shortages or do so minimally in their general plan or the local hazard mitigation plan.

(b) The state should provide guidance to improve drought planning for small water suppliers and rural communities.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 15, Sec. 8.   (AB 1668)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

10609.42.

(a) No later than January 1, 2020, the department, in consultation with the board and other relevant state and local agencies and stakeholders, shall use available data to identify small water suppliers and rural communities that may be at risk of drought and water shortage vulnerability. The department shall notify counties and groundwater sustainability agencies of those suppliers or communities that may be at risk within its jurisdiction, and may make the information publicly accessible on its Internet Web site.

(b) The department shall, in consultation with the board, by January 1, 2020, propose to the Governor and the Legislature recommendations
 and guidance relating to the development and implementation of countywide drought and water shortage contingency plans to address the planning needs of small water suppliers and rural communities. The department shall recommend how these plans can be included in county local hazard mitigation plans or otherwise integrated with complementary existing planning processes. The guidance from the department shall outline goals of the countywide drought and water shortage contingency plans and recommend components including, but not limited to, all of the following:

(1) Assessment of drought vulnerability.

(2) Actions to reduce drought vulnerability.

(3) Response, financing, and local communication and outreach planning efforts
 that may be implemented in times of drought.

(4) Data needs and reporting.

(5) Roles and responsibilities of interested parties and coordination with other relevant water management planning efforts.

(c) In formulating the proposal, the department shall utilize a public process involving state agencies, cities, counties, small communities, small water suppliers, and other stakeholders.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 15, Sec. 8.   (AB 1668)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 2.56. Drought Planning for Small Water Suppliers, State Small Water Systems, and Domestic Well Communities [10609.50. - 10609.80.]



  CHAPTER 1. General Provisions [10609.50. - 10609.51.]

10609.50.

The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(a) Droughts are predicted to become more frequent, longer, and more severe as climate change progresses, putting drinking water supplies at risk of running dry or becoming contaminated.

(b) As demonstrated by the most recent drought from 2012 to 2016, inclusive, (2012–16 drought) drought conditions disproportionally impact low-income, small, and rural communities, as demonstrated by all of the following:

(1) (A) Rural communities are more likely to rely solely on groundwater from small water suppliers or domestic wells.

(B) Domestic wells tend to be shallower and are susceptible to running dry when groundwater is overpumped.

(2) (A) The 2012–16 drought negatively impacted over 480,000 people relying on drought-impacted public water systems.

(B) Seventy-six percent of impacted public water systems were small, serving 1,000 service connections or fewer and concentrated in the southern San Joaquin Valley.

(c) There are currently varying levels of water contingency planning and coverage across counties for small water suppliers and self-supplied communities, leaving hundreds of thousands of people at risk of going without water to meet their basic household and drinking water needs during the next drought.

(d) If another drought occurs that is as severe as the 2012–16 drought, more than 4,500 domestic wells in the San Joaquin Valley may be impacted. The cost to mitigate this damage could be more than one hundred fifteen million dollars ($115,000,000).

(e) No one should go without running water during a drought. California can take basic steps to implement more proactive drought planning that would benefit the communities most at risk, and by doing so help prevent catastrophic impacts on drinking water for the communities most vulnerable to the impacts of climate change.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 245, Sec. 1.   (SB 552)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

10609.51.

For purposes of this part, the following definitions apply:

(a) “Community water system” has the same meaning as defined in Section 116275 of the Health and Safety Code.

(b) “County Drought Advisory Group” means the group created by the department to implement Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 10609.40) of Part 2.55.

(c) “Department” means the Department of Water Resources.

(d) “Domestic well” has the same meaning as defined in Section 116681 of the Health and Safety Code.

(e) “Groundwater sustainability agency” has the same meaning as defined in Section 10721.

(f) “Nontransient noncommunity water system” has the same meaning as defined in Section 116275 of the Health and Safety Code.

(g) “Public water system” has the same meaning as defined in Section 116275 of the Health and Safety Code.

(h) “Risk vulnerability tool” means the tool created by the department to implement Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 10609.40) of Part 2.55.

(i) “Rural community” means a community with fewer than 15 service connections, or regularly serving less than 25 individuals daily at least 60 days out of the year.

(j) “Small water supplier” means a community water system serving 15 to 2,999 service connections, inclusive, and that provides less than 3,000 acre-feet of water annually.

(k) “State board” means the State Water Resources Control Board.

(l) “State small water system” has the same meaning as defined in Section 116275 of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 28, Sec. 157.   (SB 1380)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Small Water Suppliers and Nontransient Noncommunity Water Systems [10609.60. - 10609.63.]

10609.60.

(a) No later than July 1, 2023, and updated every five years thereafter, a small water supplier serving 1,000 to 2,999 service connections, inclusive, and a nontransient noncommunity water system that is a school shall each develop and maintain, onsite, an abridged Water Shortage Contingency Plan (WSCP) that includes, at a minimum, all of the following drought-planning elements:

(1) Drought-planning contacts, including all of the following:

(A) At least one contact at the water system for water shortage planning and response and the development of the plan.

(B) Contacts for local public safety partners and
 potential vendors that can provide repairs or alternative water sources, including, but not limited to, local community-based organizations that work with the population in and around areas served by the water system, contractors for drilling wells, vended water suppliers, and emergency shower vendors.

(C) State and local agency contacts who should be informed when a drought or water shortage emergency is emerging or has occurred.

(D) Regional water planning groups or mutual aid networks, to the extent they exist. 

(2) Triggering mechanisms and levels for action, including both of the following:

(A) Standard water shortage levels corresponding to progressive ranges based on the water supply conditions. Water shortage levels shall also apply to
 catastrophic interruption of water supplies, including, but not limited to, a regional power outage, an earthquake, a fire, and other potential emergency events.

(B) Water shortage mitigation, response, customer communications, enforcement, and relief actions that align with the water shortage levels required by subparagraph (A).

(b) A small water supplier serving 1,000 to 2,999 service connections, inclusive, and a nontransient noncommunity water system that is a school shall each make the abridged Water Shortage Contingency Plan available on their individual internet websites, if any. A small water supplier serving 1,000 to 2,999 service connections, inclusive, or a nontransient noncommunity water system that is a school that does not have an internet website shall make the abridged Water Shortage Contingency Plan available to persons upon request. The abridged Water Shortage
 Contingency Plan shall be provided to the state board’s Division of Drinking Water for inspection upon demand.

(c) A small water supplier serving fewer than 1,000 service connections shall add drought planning elements, including, but not limited to, those listed in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) and subparagraph (A) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a), to its emergency notification or response plan and submit the plan to the state board. The plan shall be updated every five years, or when significant changes occur.

(d) No later than December 31, 2022, the department and the state board shall create an abridged Water Shortage Contingency Plan template for small water suppliers serving 1,000 to 2,999 service connections, inclusive, and nontransient noncommunity water systems that are schools to facilitate implementation of this section.

(e) To the extent that funding is made available, the state board shall offer technical assistance to small water suppliers serving fewer than 1,000 service connections and nontransient noncommunity water systems that are schools to improve drought and water shortage resiliency, including requirements related to the emergency notification or response plan.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 245, Sec. 1.   (SB 552)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

10609.61.

A small water supplier and a nontransient noncommunity water system that is a school shall each report annually water supply condition information to the state board through the state board’s Electronic Annual Reporting (eAR) System or other reporting tool, as directed by the state board. Water supply condition information includes, but is not limited to, both of the following:

(a) An inventory and assessment of each water supply source, including its available status and if any further investments or treatment are required for its utilization, any lead time required for its utilization, and its delivery parameters such as flow rate and total volume available.

(b) The reporting year’s total water
 demand volume for each month, and average and peak flowrate demand for each month and annually.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 245, Sec. 1.   (SB 552)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

10609.62.

Small water suppliers and nontransient noncommunity water systems that are schools shall implement, subject to funding availability, all of the following drought resiliency measures:

(a) No later than January 1, 2023, implement monitoring systems sufficient to detect production well groundwater levels.

(b) Beginning no later than January 1, 2023, maintain membership in the California Water/Wastewater Agency Response Network (CalWARN) or similar mutual aid organization.

(c) No later than January 1, 2024, to ensure continuous operations during power failures, provide adequate backup electrical supply.

(d) No later than January 1, 2027, have at least one backup source of water supply, or a water system intertie, that meets current water quality requirements and is sufficient to meet average daily demand.

(e) No later than January 1, 2032, meter each service connection and monitor for water loss due to leakages.

(f) No later than January 1, 2032, have source system capacity, treatment system capacity if necessary, and distribution system capacity to meet fire flow requirements.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 245, Sec. 1.   (SB 552)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

10609.63.

This chapter does not apply to small water suppliers, or small water suppliers integrated into larger water systems, that voluntarily choose to instead comply with Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 10620) of Part 2.6.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 245, Sec. 1.   (SB 552)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. State Small Water Systems Serving 5 to 14 Service Connections, Inclusive, and Domestic Wells [10609.70. - 10609.70.]

10609.70.

(a) (1) A county shall establish a standing county drought and water shortage task force to facilitate drought and water shortage preparedness for state small water systems and domestic wells within the county’s jurisdiction, and shall invite representatives from the state and other local governments, including groundwater sustainability agencies, and community-based organizations, local water suppliers, and local residents, to participate in the task force.

(2) In lieu of the task force required by paragraph (1), a county may establish an alternative process that facilitates drought and water shortage preparedness for state small water systems and domestic wells within the county’s jurisdiction. The alternative
 process shall provide opportunities for coordinating and communicating with the state and other local governments, community-based organizations, local water suppliers, and local residents on a regular basis and during drought or water shortage emergencies.

(3) A county that establishes a drought task force on or before January 1, 2022, shall be deemed in compliance with this subdivision as long as the task force continues to exist.

(b) A county shall develop a plan that includes potential drought and water shortage risk and proposed interim and long-term solutions for state small water systems and domestic wells within the county’s jurisdiction. The plan may be a stand-alone document or may be included as an element in an existing county plan, such as a local hazard mitigation plan, emergency operations plan, climate action plan, or general plan. A county shall consult with its
 drought task force or alternative coordinating process as established by this section in developing its plan. A county shall consider, at a minimum, all of the following in its plan:

(1) Consolidations for existing water systems and domestic wells.

(2) Domestic well drinking water mitigation programs.

(3) Provision of emergency and interim drinking water solutions.

(4) An analysis of the steps necessary to implement the plan.

(5) An analysis of local, state, and federal funding sources available to implement the plan.
